District of Columbia statutes.
7-504.09

Staff; technical assistance.

Necessary staff services shall be supplied in accordance with positions and funding approved in the current District government budget. In addition, the Director of the Office on Aging shall provide information and technical assistance as required under § 7-503.03.

Oct. 29, 1975, D.C. Law 1-24, title IV, § 409, 22 DCR 2462
1981 Ed., § 6-2229.
1973 Ed., § 6-1729.